South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4618.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-9-150.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, funds appropriated for classified or unclassified positions, or any other funds allocated for payroll, may not be carried forward and must revert to the general fund. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----